Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5557.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5503. The department may do 1 or more of the following: (a) Promulgate rules to establish standards for ambient air quality and for emissions. (b) Issue permits for the construction and operation of sources, processes, and process equipment, subject to enforceable emission limitations and standards and other conditions reasonably necessary to assure ensure compliance with all applicable requirements of this part, rules promulgated under this part, and the clean air act. (c) In accordance with this part and rules promulgated under this part, deny, terminate, modify, or revoke and reissue permits for cause. If an application for a permit is denied or is determined to be incomplete by the department, the department shall state in writing with particularity the reason for denial or the determination of incompleteness, and, if applicable, the provision of this part or a rule promulgated under this part that controls the decision. (d) Compel the attendance of witnesses at proceedings of the department upon on reasonable notice. (e) Make findings of fact and determinations. (f) Make, modify, or cancel orders that require, in accordance with this part, the control of air pollution. (g) Enforce permits, air quality fee requirements, and the requirements to obtain a permit. (h) Institute in a court of competent jurisdiction proceedings to compel compliance with this part, rules promulgated under this part, or any determination or order issued under this part. (i) Enter and inspect any property as authorized under section 5526. (j) Receive and initiate complaints of air pollution in alleged violation of this part, rules promulgated under this part, or any determination, permit, or order issued under this part and take action with respect to the complaint as provided in this part. (k) Require reports on sources and the quality and nature of emissions, including, but not limited to, information necessary to maintain an emissions inventory. The department shall use the longest time period authorized under the clean air act for calculating emissions rates for an emissions inventory. (l) Prepare and develop a general comprehensive plan for the control or abatement of existing air pollution and for the control or prevention of any new air pollution. (m) Encourage voluntary cooperation by all persons in controlling air pollution and air contamination. (n) Encourage the formulation and execution of plans by cooperative groups or associations of municipalities, counties, or districts, or other governmental units, industries, and others who severally or jointly are or may be the source of air pollution, for the control of pollution. (o) Cooperate with the appropriate agencies of the United States or other states or any interstate or international agencies with respect to the control of air pollution and air contamination or for the formulation for the submission to the legislature of interstate air pollution control compacts or agreements. (p) Conduct or cause to be conducted studies and research with respect to air pollution control, abatement, or prevention. (q) Conduct and supervise programs of air pollution control education including the preparation and distribution of information relating to air pollution control. (r) Determine by means of field studies and sampling the degree of air pollution in the this state. (s) Provide advisory technical consultation services to local communities. (t) Serve as the agency of the this state for the receipt of money from the federal government, or other public agencies, or private agencies and for the expenditure of that money after it is appropriated for the purpose of air pollution control studies or research or enforcement of this part. (u) Do such other things as the department considers necessary, proper, or desirable to enforce this part, a rule promulgated under this part, or any determination, permit, or order issued under this part, or the clean air act.